Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201571-2467
Drugs, medicines, and medicinal substances, defined.

Drugs, medicines, and medicinal substances means (1) articles recognized in The United States Pharmacopeia and The National Formulary, the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement to any of them, (2) articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of diseases in humans or animals, (3) articles, except food, intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of a human or an animal, (4) articles intended for use as a component of any articles specified in subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of this section, except any device or its components, parts, or accessories, and (5) prescription drugs or devices.

Laws 2015, LB37, § 11.